New York, session 2025-2026, S8040.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 13.09 of the mental hygiene law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision (j) to read as follows: 3 (j) If a person is examined pursuant to section 9.39 or 9.40 of this 4 chapter and is determined not to be mentally ill but is determined to 5 have a developmental disability, the commissioner shall be notified and 6 such person shall be turned over to the custody and care of the commis- 7 sioner who shall, pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (c) of section 13.07 8 of this article, immediately accept custody and provide such person with 9 appropriate services including care and treatment and, immediately ther- 10 eafter, shall develop comprehensive plans, programs, and services for 11 such person. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11663-01-5